Maryland, session 2026, HB1556.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
19–110.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “DIVISION” MEANS THE CONSUMER PROTECTION DIVISION OF
THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
(3) (I) “NONNUTRITIVE SWEETENER” MEANS A NONNUTRITIVE
SUBSTANCE SUITABLE FOR CONSUMPTION THAT HUMANS PERCEIVE AS SWEET AND
CONTAINS FEWER THAN FIVE CALORIES PER SERVING.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1556*

HOUSE BILL 1556
(II) “NONNUTRITIVE SWEETENER” INCLUDES:
1. ASPARTAME;
2. ACESULFAME–K;
3. NEOTAME, SACCHARIN;
4. SUCRALOSE, STEVIA; AND
5. OTHER ARTIFICIAL SWEETENERS.
(III) “NONNUTRITIVE SWEETENER” DOES NOT INCLUDE SUGAR.
(4) “SUGARY BEVERAGE” MEANS A BEVERAGE, WHETHER
CARBONATED OR NONCARBONATED, THAT IS INTENDED FOR HUMAN CONSUMPTION
AND CONTAINS ADDED SUGARS OR NONNUTRITIVE SWEETENERS.
(B) A PERSON MAY NOT PLACE AN ADVERTISEMENT FOR A SUGARY
BEVERAGE ON PROPERTY OWNED BY THE STATE, A COUNTY, OR A MUNICIPAL
CORPORATION UNLESS THE ADVERTISEMENT INCLUDES THE FOLLOWING WARNING
LABEL: “WARNING: DRINKING BEVERAGES WITH ADDED SUGAR CAN CONTRIBUTE
TO OBESITY, TYPE 2 DIABETES, AND TOOTH DECAY. NOT RECOMMENDED FOR
CHILDREN. MARYLAND STATE HEALTH WARNING.”.
(C) THE WARNING LABEL REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION SHALL:
(1) BE IN BOLD TYPEFACE;
(2) BE PRINTED IN A BOX, VISUALLY SEPARATING THE WARNING
LABEL FROM THE OTHER CONTENT IN THE ADVERTISEMENT; AND
(3) BE HIGHLY VISIBLE TO A VIEWER OF THE ADVERTISEMENT.
(D) (1) THE DIVISION MAY IMPOSE A CIVIL PENALTY NOT TO EXCEED
$1,000 ON A PERSON THAT VIOLATES THIS SECTION.
(2) EACH DAY AN ADVERTISEMENT THAT VIOLATES THIS SECTION
REMAINS ON PROPERTY OWNED BY THE STATE, A COUNTY, OR A MUNICIPAL
CORPORATION IS A SEPARATE VIOLATION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.